Kentucky statutes. TITLE I Sovereignty and Jurisdiction of the Commonwealth
CHAPTER 2 Citizenship, Emblems, Holidays, and Time

2.010.
Relinquishment of citizenship — Residence in another state or country.

When any citizen of this state, by deed in writing, in the presence of, and subscribed by, two (2) witnesses, and acknowledged or proved before the county judge/executive of the county in which he resides, or by open declaration made in such court and entered of record, shall declare that he relinquishes the character of a citizen of this state, and shall depart out of this state with the intention, in good faith, to remain absent therefrom, he shall, from the time of his departure, be considered as having exercised his right of expatriation, so far as regards this state, and shall not thenceforth be deemed a citizen thereof. When any citizen of this state shall reside elsewhere, and in good faith become a citizen of any other state, he shall not, while the citizen of the other state, be deemed a citizen of this state. No act of any citizen under this section shall have any effect if done while the United States is at war with a foreign power.

History.

333: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 121, effective June 17, 1978.

2.013.
State language.

English is designated as the official state language of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note: English Only? — The “Power” of Kentucky’s Official Language Statute, 98 Ky. L.J. 855 (2009/2010).

2.015.
Age of majority — Exceptions.

Persons of the age of eighteen (18) years are of the age of majority for all purposes in this Commonwealth except for the purchase of alcoholic beverages and for purposes of care and treatment of children with disabilities, for which twenty-one (21) years is the age of majority, all other statutes to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 21, § 1; 1968, ch. 100, § 1; 1994, ch. 405, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

2.020.
State seal.

The seal of the Commonwealth shall have upon it the device, two (2) friends embracing each other, with the words “Commonwealth of Kentucky” over their heads and around them the words, “United We Stand, Divided We Fall.”

History.

4536.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A Daniel Walker cigarette package similar to the official seal of the State of Kentucky could be used as a trademark because the design omitted the words “Commonwealth of Kentucky” which are required to be on the seal.

OAG 71-79

.

A written opinion of the office of the Attorney General of Kentucky that a design was not a prohibited replica of the seal of Kentucky would be a sufficient declaration of the right to use the design.

OAG 71-79

.

Since the higher education assistance authority is not a private concern seeking to use the Commonwealth’s seal for private or commercial purposes, and the insignia circle would merely show that the department is an agency of the Commonwealth and the scholar’s head and initials in the center would merely identify and distinguish the agency’s publications from those of all other agencies of the Commonwealth without misrepresentation, false, misleading or deceptive acts, or questionable practices, there is no statutory prohibition against the authority using such seal.

OAG 75-172

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fee for affixing seal, KRS

14.090

.

Official acts of Governor to be attested by seal, KRS

14.040

.

Secretary of State to have custody of seal, KRS

14.030

.

2.030.
State flag.

The official state flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be of navy blue silk, nylon, wool or cotton bunting, or some other suitable material, with the seal of the Commonwealth encircled by a wreath, the lower half of which shall be goldenrod in bloom and the upper half the words “Commonwealth of Kentucky,” embroidered, printed, painted, or stamped on the center thereof. The dimensions of the flag may vary, but the length shall be one and nine-tenths (1 9/10) times the width and the diameter of the seal and encirclement shall be approximately two-thirds (2/3) the width of the flag.

The approved official drawings of the state flag shall be permanently retained in the files of the office of the Secretary of State. All state flags for official use of the Commonwealth shall conform as to color and design with these official drawings.

The emblem at the head of a flagstaff used to display the flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be the Kentucky cardinal in an alert but restful pose, cast in bronze, brass, or other suitable material.

The flying of the state flag at all state buildings and installations including public school buildings, National Guard armories, state parks, and other such buildings is considered proper and is encouraged.

No disrespect should be shown to the flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. With the exception of the flag of the United States of America, the flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky should not be dipped to any person or thing. The flag should never touch anything beneath it, such as the ground, the floor, water, or merchandise. The flag, when it is in such condition that it is no longer a fitting emblem for display, should be destroyed in a dignified way, preferably by burning.

All official flags of the Commonwealth of Kentucky purchased by a public institution shall be manufactured in the United States.

History.

4618m: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 114, §§ 1 to 4, effective June 14, 1962; 2002, ch. 196, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 4, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

2.035.
Pledge of allegiance to state flag.

The following shall be the official pledge of allegiance to the flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky: “I pledge allegiance to the Kentucky flag, and to the Sovereign State for which it stands, one Commonwealth, blessed with diversity, natural wealth, beauty, and grace from on High.”

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.040.
United States flag to be displayed on public buildings and schools — To be supplied schools.

The flag of the United States shall be displayed on the main administration buildings of every public institution, and, during school days, either from the flagstaff or, in inclement weather, within the school building of every schoolhouse.

The flag, with staff or flagpole, shall be provided for every schoolhouse.

All official flags of the United States purchased by a public institution shall be manufactured in the United States.

History.

2089i-1, 2089i-2: amend. Acts 2009, ch. 4, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

2.041.
Display of United States flag at half-staff.

The Governor is authorized and requested to issue a proclamation calling upon state officials to display the United States flag at half-staff on all state buildings from sunrise to sunset for not less than one (1) day in the event of the death of Kentucky emergency response personnel in the line of duty.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 43, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

2.042.
Right to display United States flag at a person’s residence.

Notwithstanding any agreement or restrictions contravening a person’s right to display a flag, that person may display a flag of the United States which is no larger than two (2) feet by three (3) feet from the person’s residence, regardless of whether the person owns or leases the residence, provided that the flag is displayed in such a manner as is deemed proper by state or federal law, including 36

U.S.C. secs. 173

et seq. Any agreement contravening this right shall be void and unenforceable in any court of the Commonwealth. No person shall discriminate or retaliate against a person who properly displays the flag of the United States in conformity with this section and not in contravention of any other statute or administrative regulation directly regulating the flag’s display. This section shall supplement, and not limit or abridge in any manner, the right of persons to otherwise display the flag of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 553, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2.050.
Printing or lettering on United States flag, or use for advertising purposes — Exception.

Printing or lettering of any kind on the flag of the United States, or the use of the flag for advertising purposes in any manner, is prohibited.

Nothing in this section or in KRS

2.060

shall prohibit a newspaper from publishing a picture of the flag of the United States next to the obituary of a deceased active member or honorably discharged veteran of the United States military service.

History.

2089i-3, 2089i-4: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 64, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

2.060.
United States flag not to be used for advertisement.

No person shall in any manner, for exhibition or display, place or cause to be placed upon, or expose or cause to be exposed to public view any flag, standard, colors or ensign of the United States upon which has been placed, or to which is attached, appended, affixed or annexed, any word, figure, mark, picture, design or drawing, or advertisement of any nature; nor shall any person manufacture, sell, expose for sale or to public view or give away or have in possession for sale or to be given away or for use for any purpose, any article of merchandise, or a receptacle for merchandise or thing for carrying or transporting merchandise upon which has been placed a representation of any such flag, standard, colors or ensign, to advertise, call attention to, decorate, mark or distinguish the article on which so placed.

History.

2089i-5: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 296, effective January 1, 1975.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Flag desecration, Penal Code, KRS

525.110

.

2.065.
POW/MIA flag — Flags purchased or displayed by public institutions to be manufactured in United States.

As used in this section, “Prisoner of War and Missing in Action flag” or “POW/MIA flag” means the POW/MIA flag designated in 36

U.S.C. sec. 902

by the United States Congress as the symbol of the nation’s commitment and concern for the fate of Americans still prisoner, missing in action, or otherwise unaccounted for as a result of hostile action.

All POW/MIA flags purchased by a public institution or displayed by a public institution shall be manufactured in the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 4, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

2.070.
Displaying or carrying in parade anarchistic or immoral flag. [Repealed]

2.080.
State bird.

The native redbird, commonly known as the Kentucky cardinal (cardinalis), is the official state bird of Kentucky.

History.

4618n.

2.081.
State agricultural insect.

The honeybee is named and designated as the official state agricultural insect of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 19, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

2.082.
State fossil.

The brachiopod is named and designated as the state fossil of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 488, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

2.083.
State butterfly.

The viceroy butterfly is named and designated as the state butterfly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 78, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

2.084.
State drink.

Milk is named and designated as the official state drink of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Article:Milk and Other Intoxicating Choices: Official State Symbol Adoption, 41 N. Ky. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

2.085.
State wild animal game species.

The gray squirrel is named and designated as the state wild animal game species.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 219.

2.086.
Original Kentucky soft drink.

Ale-8-One is named and designated as an original Kentucky soft drink.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 85, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

2.087.
State horse.

The Thoroughbred horse is named and designated as the state horse of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 62, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

2.089.
State fruit.

The blackberry is named and designated as the official fruit of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

2.090.
State flower.

The goldenrod is the official state flower of Kentucky.

History.

4618o.

2.091.
State rock.

Kentucky agate is named and designated as the official rock of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.092.
State gemstone.

The fresh-water pearl is named and designated the state gemstone of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 488, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

2.093.
State soil.

The Crider soil series is named and designated as the state soil.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 115, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

2.094.
State mineral.

Coal is named and designated as the official mineral of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 230, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2.095.
State tree.

The tulip poplar is named and designated as the Kentucky state tree.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 43, § 1; 1994, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

2.096.
State arboretum.

The Bernheim Arboretum and Research Forest shall be designated as the official state arboretum of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 17, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

2.097.
State botanical garden.

The University of Kentucky-Fayette County Arboretum shall be designated as the official state botanical garden of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.098.
State Science Center.

The Louisville Science Center shall be designated as the State Science Center of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

2.099.
State honey festival.

The Clarkson Honeyfest is named and designated the official state honey festival.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 11, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

2.100.
State song — Bluegrass song.

The song, “My Old Kentucky Home,” by Stephen Collins Foster, is the official state song of Kentucky.

The song, “Blue Moon of Kentucky” by Bill Monroe, is the bluegrass song of Kentucky.

History.

4618p: amend. Acts 1988, ch. 134, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

The modern version of “My Old Kentucky Home” was adopted during the 1986 Regular Session of the General Assembly by the House of Representatives in House Resolution 159 and the Senate in Senate Resolution 114. This version substitutes the word “people” for the word “darkies.”

2.101.
State dance.

Clogging is named and designated as the official dance of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

2.102.
State music.

Bluegrass music is named and designated the official state music of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 12, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

2.103.
State musical instrument.

The Appalachian dulcimer is named and designated as the official musical instrument of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 160, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

2.104.
State theatre pipe organ.

The Kentucky Theatre’s Mighty Wurlitzer Theatre Pipe Organ located in Lexington is the official theatre pipe organ of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

2.105.
Official Latin motto.

The phrase “Deo gratiam habeamus” is named and designated the Commonwealth’s official Latin motto.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 314, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

2.106.
State sports car.

The Corvette is named and designated the official state sports car of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 174, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

2.107.
State outdoor musical.

“Stephen Foster — The Musical” is named and designated as the official state outdoor musical of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

2.108.
Hurricane Creek coal mine site designated as state historic site.

The Hurricane Creek coal mine site in Leslie County, at which thirty-eight (38) miners lost their lives on December 30, 1970, is designated as a state historic site.

As funds are available, Leslie County shall construct a memorial to those who perished, which shall include but not be limited to:

A monument to the miners, to be built at the mine site with the names of the thirty-eight (38) miners who lost their lives and the one (1) survivor;

Informational materials about the mining disaster;

Signage, off-street parking, and other features to encourage visitors; and

A plan for construction and periodic maintenance of the monument site.

Leslie County’s fiscal court is authorized to establish a restricted account for the site, and to raise funds from federal, state, and local entities and from private sources for this account. Funds in the account shall be expended only for the mining disaster memorial. Moneys received and expended shall be reported separately in the county’s budget.

The Governor shall, prior to December 30, 2010, issue a proclamation recognizing the fortieth anniversary of the Hurricane Creek mine disaster, memorializing the deceased miners and their families, and honoring the courage of all Kentucky’s miners. The Governor shall call upon all citizens to observe the occasion honoring miners in communities across the Commonwealth. The Governor is authorized to recognize the mine disaster anniversary in future years, on or before December 30, through a proclamation.

Working with Leslie County officials, state agencies shall provide assistance in informing the public about the site. The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, with assistance from the Kentucky Heritage Council, the Kentucky Historical Society, the Division of Mine Safety, and the Kentucky Mining Board, and within the limits of funds available, shall prepare and distribute information about the Hurricane Creek mining disaster, the risks which miners faced historically, and the advances in mining safety since the 1970 disaster.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

2.109.
Official center for celebration of African American heritage.

The Kentucky Center for African American Heritage in Louisville is designated as the official center for the celebration of Kentucky’s African American heritage.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 346, § 236, effective July 15, 2002.

2.1095.
Kentucky Museum of African American
History.

Jackson Hall at Kentucky State University is designated
the Kentucky Museum of African American History.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 176, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

2.110.
Public holidays.

The first day of January (New Year’s Day), the third Monday of January (Birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr.), the nineteenth day of January (Robert E. Lee Day), the thirtieth day of January (Franklin D. Roosevelt Day), the twelfth day of February (Lincoln’s Birthday), the third Monday in February (Washington’s Birthday), the last Monday in May (Memorial Day), the third day of June (Confederate Memorial Day, and Jefferson Davis Day), the fourth day of July (Independence Day), the first Monday in September (Labor Day), the second Monday in October (Columbus Day), the eleventh day of November (Veterans Day), the twenty-fifth day of December (Christmas Day) of each year, and all days appointed by the President of the United States or by the Governor as days of thanksgiving, are holidays, on which all the public offices of this Commonwealth may be closed.

No person shall be compelled to labor on the first Monday in September (Labor Day) by any person.

History.

2089b to 2089g, 2089j: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 5, § 1; 1948, ch. 73, § 1; 1958, ch. 73; 1970, ch. 50, § 1; 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1974, ch. 176, § 1; 1978, ch. 24, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 88, § 1, effective January 1, 1986; 1992, ch. 77, § 17, effective July 14, 1992.

2.115.
Suspension of holidays during World War II. [Repealed.]

2.120.
Flag Day.

The fourteenth day of June of each year is “Flag Day.”

History.

2089i.

2.130.
Mother’s Day.

The Governor is authorized and requested to issue annually a proclamation calling upon the state officials to display the United States flag on all state and school buildings and the people of the state to display the flag at their homes, lodges, churches, and places of business and other suitable places, on the second Sunday in May, known as Mother’s Day, as a public expression of love and reverence for the mothers of our state and other women serving it and as an inspiration for better homes and closer ties between the home and our Commonwealth.

History.

2089h.

2.132.
Grandmother’s Day.

The Governor is authorized and requested to issue annually a proclamation calling upon the state officials to display the United States flag on all state and school buildings and the people of the state to display the flag at their homes, lodges, churches, places of business and other suitable places on the second Sunday in October, known as Grandmother’s Day as a public expression of the love, esteem and reverence in which grandmothers are held by the citizens of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 6, effective June 19, 1958.

2.135.
Barrier Awareness Day — Disability Day.

May 7 of each year is named and declared to be “Barrier Awareness Day” throughout the Commonwealth.

August 2 of each year is named and declared to be “Disability Day” throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 68, § 1, effective May 7, 1988; 1994, ch. 405, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

2.140.
General Pulaski’s Day.

The Governor shall issue a proclamation calling upon officials of the government to display the flag of the United States on all governmental buildings on October 11 of each year and inviting the people of Kentucky to observe the day in schools and churches, or other suitable places, with appropriate ceremonies in commemoration of the death of General Casimir Pulaski.

History.

2089k.

2.145.
Kentucky Harvest Day.

November 15 is designated as “Kentucky Harvest Day.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 475, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2.147.
Juneteenth National Freedom Day.

The nineteenth of June each year shall be observed in Kentucky as “Juneteenth National Freedom Day.”

The Governor shall proclaim June 19 of each year as “Juneteenth National Freedom Day” and will encourage all Kentuckians celebrating this day to honor and reflect on the significant roles that African-Americans have played in the history of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 48, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

2.148.
A Day of Prayer for Kentucky’s Students.

The General Assembly recognizes that the students of the Commonwealth are the state’s single greatest resource and designates the last Wednesday in September of each year as A Day of Prayer for Kentucky’s Students.

The Governor shall annually proclaim the last Wednesday in September as A Day of Prayer for Kentucky’s Students and shall call upon the citizens of the state, in accordance with their own faith and consciences, to pray, meditate, or otherwise reflect upon the students of this state as well as their teachers, administrators, and schools.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 141, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

2.149.
Farmer Suicide Prevention Day.

The Wednesday of National Farm Safety Week, which is the third week of September, shall be observed in Kentucky as “Farmer Suicide Prevention Day.”

The Governor shall annually proclaim the Wednesday of National Farm Safety Week as “Farmer Suicide Prevention Day” and encourage citizens of this Commonwealth to recognize the mental health challenges faced in the farming community and to fully support those farmers and farm families who produce the food, fiber, feed, and fuel for this nation and the world.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

2.150.
Daylight saving time in counties containing a city of the first class. [Repealed.]

2.152.
9/11 First Responders Day.

The eleventh day of September each year shall be observed in Kentucky as “9/11 First Responders Day.”

The Governor is authorized and requested to issue a proclamation annually recognizing “9/11 First Responders Day” honoring those men and women who rushed, without hesitation, to save lives as our nation and its people were attacked by terrorists on September 11, 2001. The purpose of “9/11 First Responders Day” is to ensure that we never forget the tragic events of September 11, 2001, and to protect and preserve the honor that is duly deserved for those who responded to the unprecedented emergency on that day.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 65, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

2.155.
Kentucky National Guard Day.

The twenty-fourth day of June of each year is designated as Kentucky National Guard Day in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.156.
State gun.

The Kentucky Long Rifle is named and designated the official gun of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 156, effective June 25, 2013.

2.157.
Kentucky Retired Veterans Day.

July 1 of each year is designated as Kentucky Retired Veterans Day.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 83, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

2.158.
Korean War Armistice Day.

To recognize Armed Forces members who courageously served during the Korean War, July 27, the date of the military armistice agreement that ended the war, shall be observed in Kentucky as “Korean War Armistice Day.”

The Governor shall issue an annual proclamation for the observance of “Korean War Armistice Day” and request that some portion of the day be used for solemn contemplation on the sacrifices that members of the United States Armed Forces made during that war.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

2.159.
Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day.

The thirtieth day of March each year is designated as Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

2.160.
Standard of time. [Repealed.]

2.170.
Observance of standard time by political subdivisions. [Repealed.]

2.180.
Violation of time standard by political subdivisions. [Repealed.]

2.190.
Presidential election day.

The Tuesday after the first Monday in November in Presidential election years shall be a state holiday on which all state offices, all schools and all state universities and colleges shall be closed. Any employee who is required to work on said state holiday shall receive compensatory pay or time off.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 188, § 71, effective December 1, 1972; 1992, ch. 77, § 18, effective July 14, 1992.

2.200.
Declaration of day of mourning.

The Governor is authorized to declare a day of mourning in the Commonwealth of Kentucky on suitable and appropriate occasions. Such declaration of a day of mourning shall in no way affect the operation of banks and trust companies, public schools, public offices, state agencies or any other segment of public or private endeavor in the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 198, § 1, effective June 21, 1974.

2.210.
Kentucky Shakespeare Festival.

Shakespeare in Central Park of Louisville, Kentucky, is hereby designated as the Kentucky Shakespeare Festival.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

2.220.
Kentucky Commonwealth Theatre.

Devou Park Summer Classics Theatre of Covington shall be designated as the Kentucky Commonwealth Theatre.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

State Theatre of Kentucky, designation, KRS

153.110

.

2.225.
State amphitheater.

The Iroquois Amphitheater, located in Iroquois Park in Louisville, Kentucky, is named and designated as the state amphitheater.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 116, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

2.227.
Anti-Bullying Month.

The General Assembly recognizes its responsibility to secure the environment for all Kentucky students. Thus, October of each year shall be designated as Anti-Bullying Month in the Commonwealth.

As a symbol of awareness of the serious issues and negative effects of bullying, the official ribbon for the Anti-Bullying Month in the Commonwealth shall be purple and yellow. The color purple is a reminder of domestic violence and the color yellow is in memory of those who have taken their lives as a result of bullying.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

2.230.
Native American Indian Month.

The month of November of each year shall be observed in Kentucky as “Native American Indian Month” and during this month schools, clubs, and civic and religious organizations are encouraged to recognize the contributions of Native American Indians with suitable ceremony and fellowship designed to promote greater understanding and brotherhood between Native American Indians and the non-Native American Indian people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The Governor shall, prior to the first day of November of each year, issue a proclamation inviting and urging the people of the Commonwealth to observe Native American Indian Month with suitable ceremony and fellowship.

The Kentucky Department of Education, Kentucky Heritage Council, and the Native American Heritage Commission established in KRS

171.820

shall, within the limits of funds available for this purpose, make information available to all people of this Commonwealth regarding Native American Indian Month and the observance thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 352, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 49, § 3, effective July 13, 2004.

2.233.
Diffuse Intrinsic Pontine Glioma Awareness Day.

May 17 of each year is designated as “Diffuse Intrinsic Pontine Glioma Awareness Day” throughout the Commonwealth.

The Governor shall proclaim May 17 of each year as “Diffuse Intrinsic Pontine Glioma Awareness Day” to raise awareness and encourage research into effective treatments and cures.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 101, sec. 2. provides that this statute, which was created by the Act, may be cited as the Candace Metten Act.

2.234.
ALS Awareness Day.

February 21 of each year is designated as “ALS Awareness Day” throughout the Commonwealth.

The Governor shall proclaim February 21 of each year as “ALS Awareness Day” and shall encourage Kentuckians to support research into effective treatments and an eventual cure.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

2.235.
Mesothelioma Awareness Day.

September 26 of each year is designated “Mesothelioma Awareness Day” throughout the Commonwealth.

The Governor shall proclaim September 26 of each year as “Mesothelioma Awareness Day” and shall encourage Kentuckians to support research into effective treatments and early-detection methods.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

2.236.
Arthrogryposis Multiplex Congenita Awareness Day.

The thirtieth day of June of each year is designated and shall be observed in Kentucky as “Arthrogryposis Multiplex Congenita Awareness Day.”

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

2.237.
Coal Miners Appreciation Week — Coal Truck Driver Appreciation Day.

The third week of August of each year shall be designated as Coal Miners Appreciation Week, and the Monday of the fourth week shall be designated as Coal Truck Driver Appreciation Day. The Governor may annually issue a proclamation designating the third week of August as Coal Miners Appreciation Week and the Monday of the fourth week as Coal Truck Driver Appreciation Day, and calling upon coal mining businesses and all citizens of the Commonwealth to observe the occasion and honor the coal miners and coal truck drivers of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 56, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 24, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

2.240.
Organ Donor Awareness Week.

The fourth week of April of each year is designated as Organ Donor Awareness Week, and the Governor shall annually issue a proclamation inviting and urging the people of the Commonwealth to be involved with appropriate activities. This observance is created to educate the citizens of the Commonwealth about the importance of organ donation.

As part of Organ Donor Awareness Week, the Governor and the House of Representatives and the Senate of the General Assembly shall honor those persons who have donated organs and surviving family members with a ceremony in the Capitol rotunda. Each person who has donated an organ shall be recognized collectively by citation and, upon request, the person or the person’s family shall be given a copy of the citation. The Governor may establish an organ donor honor board to collect the name of each person, subject to the person’s consent, who donates an organ in the Commonwealth during the year, and to recognize medical professionals, educators, volunteers, public employees, and private organizations that are involved with the organ donation process. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require reporting of the name of any person involved with the organ donation process or to supersede patient confidentiality protections established by statute, the Board of Medical Licensure or other state entity, or the Federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act.

Education efforts are encouraged to focus on the importance of organ donation and its significance with saving the lives of Kentuckians. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services is encouraged to develop and circulate materials relating to organ donation, including but not limited to:

The benefits of living organ donation; and

The impact of living organ donation on the access of a living organ donor to insurance, including the protections set forth in KRS

304.12-087

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 121, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 72, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 55, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

2.245.
Retired Teachers’ Week.

The fourth week of May of each year is designated as Retired Teachers’ Week. The Governor may annually issue a proclamation designating the fourth week of May as Retired Teachers’ Week and calling upon public schools and citizens of the state to observe the occasion and honor the retired teachers of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

2.250.
Garden week.

The first week of June of each year is “Garden Week.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 78, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

2.255.
“Commonwealth Cleanup” week — Environmental Education Month.

The fourth week of March each year shall be “Commonwealth Cleanup” week, culminating with a statewide cleanup day on the Saturday of that week. This week shall provide an opportunity for Kentucky communities, in partnership with local, regional, and state entities, to clean and display the natural beauty of the Commonwealth.

Local governments and private businesses shall be encouraged to participate in “Commonwealth Cleanup” week through developing, organizing, and implementing activities that highlight the natural beauty of their communities. They are encouraged to work in partnership with civic and volunteer organizations as well as corporate sponsors. Their goal shall be to consider the ways in which Kentucky’s beauty enriches their daily living and underpins their economic vitality. Examples of “Commonwealth Cleanup” week activities include: encouraging local communities to offer prizes for those groups who collect the most litter; asking boat owners to volunteer their services to help remove litter from shorelines not easily reached by land; and setting up locations for recyclables.

The Kentucky National Guard is encouraged to support this effort by providing logistical support across the Commonwealth to help clean up the sites too large for volunteer groups.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall promote “Commonwealth Cleanup” week by continuing to support those agencies and organizations wanting to clean up the environment. The support shall include providing technical assistance in assessing and understanding Kentucky’s natural resources, coordinating contacts with other state and federal agencies that can assist with a project as appropriate, guiding local organizers to possible sources of funding to help implement a project as appropriate, overseeing a statewide campaign to publicize “Commonwealth Cleanup” week, and promoting those communities that have outstanding participation. This includes working in tandem with the Kentucky Department of Education to sponsor a statewide poster contest for children through the eighth grade.

The month of March shall be designated as Environmental Education Month. During this time, state agencies involved in environmental education are encouraged to work with schools and communities to promote the environment and its preservation. Schools shall also be encouraged to sponsor cleanup or beautifying activities on their grounds during this month.

The “Commonwealth Cleanup” week activities shall culminate with the Governor proclaiming the success of those communities, civic organizations, and corporate sponsors that excel in cleaning up where they live.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 346, §§ 1-6, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

2.260.
State Tug-of-War Championship.

The Fordsville (Ohio County) Tug-of-War Championship Contest is named and designated as the Kentucky State Tug-of-War Championship.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

2.270.
Covered bridge capital of Kentucky — Official covered bridge of Kentucky.

Fleming County is named and designated as the “Covered Bridge Capital of Kentucky.”

The Switzer Covered Bridge in Franklin County is named and designated as the official covered bridge of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 404, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2.275.
Birthplace of beer cheese.

Clark County, Kentucky, is named and designated as the birthplace of beer cheese.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 124, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

2.280.
Official steam locomotive of Kentucky.

Steam locomotive #152, a 4-6-2 Light Pacific, formerly of the Louisville and Nashville Railroad and restored to operation by the volunteer members of the Kentucky Railway Museum, is named and designated as the official steam locomotive of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.300.
State silverware pattern.

Old Kentucky Blue Grass-The Georgetown Pattern is named and designated as the official state silverware pattern.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 278, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

2.350.
Official saddle of Kentucky.

The Kentucky Springseat Saddle (Minihan) is named and designated the official saddle of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 17, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

2.400.
State bourbon festival.

The Kentucky Bourbon Festival, Incorporated, of Bardstown, Kentucky, is named and designated the official state bourbon festival.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 363, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2.990.
Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of KRS

2.060

shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

2089i-5.

2.991.
Penalty. [Repealed.]